New York, session 2025-2026, A6640.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "correctional abuse accountability act". 3 § 2. Section 137 of the correction law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 5-a to read as follows: 5 5-a. (a) If a department correctional officer is involved in the seri- 6 ous injury, harm, or other maltreatment, as provided for in subdivision 7 five of this section, of an incarcerated individual, such officer shall 8 be removed immediately and placed into a different position within the 9 department in which the officer shall have no direct contact with any 10 incarcerated individual. 11 (b) If a department correctional officer is charged with involvement 12 in the homicide of an incarcerated individual, such officer shall be 13 placed on leave during the course of the department's investigation. If 14 the officer is found to have been involved in the homicide, such offi- 15 cer's employment with the department shall be terminated immediately. 16 (c) No provision of this subdivision shall be interpreted as shielding 17 such an officer from civil or criminal action. Department investigation 18 need not be completed or have implicated the officer before a civil or 19 criminal action may be commenced. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09229-02-5